Utah statutes.
67-19a-101.5.   Transition.

(1)  The board that is repealed by Laws of Utah 2010, Chapter 249, on July 1, 2010, shall:

(a)  continue to exist until June 30, 2011, with the same membership, duties, and procedures only for the purpose of addressing a grievance submitted to the employee's supervisor on or before June 30, 2010; and

(b)  apply the law in effect on June 30, 2010 to a grievance described in Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  The amendments to this chapter made by Laws of Utah 2010, Chapter 249, apply only to a grievance submitted to the employee's supervisor on or after July 1, 2010.

